Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.12.060

Vacancy for nonattendance.

In addition a council position shall become vacant if the councilmember fails to attend three consecutive regular meetings of the council without being excused by the council.

[ 1994 c 223 s 33; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.12.060.]